apertium-cs-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="obr/nit__vblex">  <!-- tgv.pp, pp.impers and ger missing -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nit</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__čti"/> 
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ním</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>níš</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ní</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>níme</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>níte</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ní</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e> <!-- check -->



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>něn</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nil</l>
        <r>nit<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mi/nout__vblex"> <!-- ger and pp.impers missing -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nout</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udrž"/> 
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nu</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>neš</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>neme</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>nem</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nete</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nou</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nul</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nut</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__chtěn"/> 
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nul</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nuv</l>
        <r>nout<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__měv"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/ědět__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ědět</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íš</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íme</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íte</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ědí</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěděl</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěděn</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__chtěn"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ědění</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ědouc</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěděn</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěd</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__jsa"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěděn</l>
        <r>ědět<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/ézt__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ézt</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezu</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezeš</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eze</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezeme</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ezem</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezete</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezou</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>



    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezl</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezen</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__chtěn"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezení</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__úterý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezouc</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezen</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ez</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__jsa"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ez</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__udrž"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ezen</l>
        <r>ézt<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__četl"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="dohonit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>doho</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="doplnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dopl</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naplnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>napl</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ocenit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>oce</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oženit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ože</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podmanit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>podma</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přičinit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přiči</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzákonit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>uzáko</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="učinit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>uči</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vědět"><par n="v_neg"/><i>v</i><par n="v/ědět__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vézt"><par n="v_neg"/><i>v</i><par n="v/ézt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vyplnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vypl</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vyčlenit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>vyčle</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="včlenit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>včle</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaplnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zapl</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zazvonit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zazvo</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="začlenit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>začle</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="změnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>změ</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zranit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zra</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zúčastnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>súčast</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minout"><par n="v_neg"/><i>mi</i><par n="mi/nout__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odklonit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odklo</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odstranit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>odstra</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zúčastnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>zúčast</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
